Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB407.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2709.1(a), (b) and (c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 2709.1. Stalking.(a) [Offense] Stalking offense defined.--A person commits the crime of stalking when the person either:(1) engages in a course of conduct or repeatedly commits acts toward another person, including following the person without proper authority, under circumstances which demonstrate either an intent to place such other person in reasonable fear of bodily injury or to cause substantial emotional distress to such other person; or1234567891011121314151617 (2) engages in a course of conduct or repeatedly communicates to another person under circumstances which demonstrate or communicate either an intent to place such other person in reasonable fear of bodily injury or to cause substantial emotional distress to such other person.(b) Venue for stalking offense.--(1) An offense committed under [this section] subsec tion (a) may be deemed to have been committed at either the place at which the communication or communications were made or at the place where the communication or communications were received.(2) [Acts] For an offense committed under subsection (a), acts indicating a course of conduct which occur in more than one jurisdiction may be used by any other jurisdiction in which an act occurred as evidence of a continuing pattern of conduct or a course of conduct.(c) Grading for stalking offense.--(1) Except as otherwise provided for in paragraph (2), a first offense under [this section] subsection (a) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the first degree.(2) A second or subsequent offense under [this section] subsection (a) or a first offense under subsection (a) if the person has been previously convicted of a crime of violence involving the same victim, family or household member, including, but not limited to, a violation of section 2701 (relating to simple assault), 2702 (relating to aggravated assault), 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person), 2718 (relating to strangulation), 2901 (relating to kidnapping), 3121 (relating to rape) or 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse), an order issued 20250HB0407PN1295 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 4954 (relating to protective orders) or an order issued under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108 (relating to relief) shall constitute a felony of the third degree.(c.1) Unauthorized location tracking offense defined.--Except as provided under subsection (c.2), a person commits the offense of unauthorized location tracking when the person installs or places a technological device , PROGRAM OR APPLICATION or causes the technological device , PROGRAM OR APPLICATION to be placed on the person or property of another person to determine or monitor the location or movement of another person.(c.2) Exceptions.--The provisions of subsection (c.1) shall not apply to the installation, placement or use of an electronic tracking device:(1) by an investigative officer, law enforcement officer or agency while conducting an investigation, when the investigative officer, law enforcement officer or agency is engaged in the lawful performance of official duties and is otherwise in accordance with Federal and State law;(2) pursuant to a court order or as part of supervision for a pretrial diversionary program, probation or parole;(3) unless prohibited by court order, by the parent or legal guardian of a minor when tracking the minor or by a person authorized by the parent or legal guardian to serve as a caretaker of the minor at any time when the minor is under the caretaker's sole care, if:(i) the parents or legal guardians are lawfully married to each other and are not separated or otherwise living apart;(ii) the parent or legal guardian is the sole 20250HB0407PN1295 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surviving parent or legal guardian of the minor;(iii) the parent or legal guardian has primary physical custody of the minor while the electronic tracking device is installed and monitored; or(iv) the parents or legal guardians are divorced, separated or otherwise living apart and both consent to the installation of and monitoring by the electronic tracking device;(4) by a legally authorized guardian of an incapacitated person as defined in 20 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to definitions) or by a caregiver or family member of a senior citizen or an adult with a disability, if a physician of the senior citizen or adult with a disability recommends the installation of an electronic tracking device or tracking application to ensure the safety of the senior citizen or adult with a disability;(5) by the owner, lessee or contractor of a fleet vehicle who installs or directs the installation of the electronic tracking device on the vehicle during the period of ownership, lease or contract if:(i) the electronic tracking device is removed before the vehicle's title is transferred or the vehicle's lease expires;(ii) the new owner of the vehicle, in the case of a sale, the lessor of the vehicle, in the case of an expired lease, or the contractor, in the case of an expired contractual agreement, consents in writing to the nonremoval of the electronic tracking device; or(iii) the owner of the vehicle at the time of installation of the electronic tracking device was the 20250HB0407PN1295 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 original manufacturer of the vehicle AND A NOTICE OF THE ELECTRONIC TRACKING DEVICE IS CONSPICUOUSLY DISPLAYED IN THE VEHICLE ; (6) by an electronic communications provider to the extent that the installation, placement or use is disclosed in the provider's terms of use, privacy policy or similar document and accepted by the customer; or(7) by a person acting in good faith on behalf of a business entity for a legitimate business interest. WHO HAS OBTAINED INFORMED CONSENT FOR THE PLACEMENT OF THE ELECTRONIC TRACKING DEVICE.(c.3) Venue for unauthorized location tracking offense.--An offense committed under subsection (c.1) may be deemed to have been committed where:(1) the information was received; (2) the victim resides; or (3) the property is located. (c.4) Grading for unauthorized location tracking offense.--A violation under subsection (c.1) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.(C.4) GRADING FOR UNAUTHORIZED LOCATION TRACKING OFFENSE.--(1) A VIOLATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C.1) SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE. (2) IF THE VICTIM IS PROTECTED FROM THE ACTOR BY AN ACTIVE ORDER ISSUED UNDER 23 PA.C.S. § 6108 (RELATING TO RELIEF) OR A BAIL CONDITION IMPOSED IN A SEPARATE PENDING MATTER, THE OFFENSE SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE.(3) IF THE ACTOR HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY CONVICTED UNDER THIS SECTION, THE OFFENSE SHALL CONSTITUTE A MISDEMEANOR OF 20250HB0407PN1295 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE FIRST DEGREE.(C.5) RESTITUTION FOR UNAUTHORIZED LOCATION TRACKING OFFENSE.--THE COST TO REMOVE ANY TECHNOLOGICAL DEVICE UNDER SUBSECTION (C.1) ON ANY PERSON OR PROPERTY SHALL BE IMPOSED ON THE DEFENDANT.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0407PN1295 - 6 - 1234567